Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.692, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Modifications to medical assistance. new text end new text begin (a) Any modification to the entity administering, or with primary control over the administration of, a benefit or service required to be covered by medical assistance does not apply to county-based purchasing unless: new text end new text begin (1) the modification is expressly described in this section; and new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner has published the written estimate of local fiscal impacts described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) Any modification to the benefits or services required to be covered by medical assistance does not apply to county-based purchasing unless: new text end new text begin (1) the modification is expressly described in this section; and new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner has published the written estimate of local fiscal impacts described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (c) Before the effective date of a modification described in paragraph (a) or (b), the commissioner must publish a written estimate of the local fiscal impacts to counties or groups of counties administering county-based purchasing arising from the modification. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end